Utah statutes.
11-42-706.   Validation of prior guaranty fund or reserve fund proceedings.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), all proceedings before April 30, 2007 related to the creation, maintenance, and use of a guaranty fund or reserve fund are validated, ratified, and confirmed.

(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed to affect the validity of a guaranty fund or reserve fund whose legality is being contested on April 30, 2007.

